District of Columbia statutes.
28-4103

Penalties.

(a)

(1)

A person who violates § 28-4102(a) shall be subject to a fine of not more than $1,000.

(2)

The Mayor may revoke, suspend, or limit the license, permit, or certificate of occupancy of a person who violates § 28-4102(a).

(b)

A violation of § 28-4102(a) shall be a civil infraction for the purposes of the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs Civil Infractions Act of 1985, effective October 5, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-42; § 2-1801.01 et seq.) (“Civil Infractions Act” ). Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as sanctions for any infraction, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

History

Mar. 20, 1992, D.C. Law 9-80, § 2, 39 DCR 675
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 27(h), 40 DCR 6311

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-4103.